Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.005

"County commissioners" defined.

The term "county commissioners" when used in this title or any other provision of law shall include the governmental authority empowered to so act under the provisions of a charter adopted by any county of the state.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 117 s 1.]